Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.010

Substance use disorder professional certification.

The legislature recognizes substance use disorder professionals as discrete health professionals. Substance use disorder professional certification serves the public interest.

[ 2019 c 444 s 1; 1998 c 243 s 1.]